Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1423
Access.

(1) The tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter into the dwelling unit in order to inspect the premises, make necessary or agreed repairs, decorations, alterations, or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants, workmen, or contractors.

(2) The landlord may enter the dwelling unit without consent of the tenant in case of emergency.

(3) The landlord shall not abuse the right of access or use it to harass the tenant. Except in case of emergency or if it is impracticable to do so, the landlord shall:

(a) Give the tenant at least twenty-four hours' written notice of the landlord's intent to enter. Such notice shall be provided to each individual unit and include the intended purpose for entry and a reasonable period during which the landlord anticipates making entry; and

(b) Enter only at reasonable times.

(4) The landlord has no other right of access except by court order, as permitted by subsection (2) of section 76-1432, or if the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the premises.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 23;

Laws 2021, LB320, § 4.